Illinois, session 104th, SB3340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. 5    (a) This Act may be cited as the Protective Medical 6Equipment Freedom Act.7    (b) This Act may be referred to as Kiki's Law. 8    Section 5. Purpose. The General Assembly finds the 9following:10        (1) All individuals have the right to wear protective 11    medical equipment in any place of public accommodation, 12    thereby promoting public health and individual safety 13    without discrimination or undue restriction.14        (2) Colette "Kiki" Walkington had extremely complex 15    medical needs and fragile health. After receiving a kidney 16    transplant from her father, Kiki was placed on 17    immunosuppressants and would most likely not survive any 18    severe respiratory infection. Kiki was full of joy and 19    brought light to all those who knew her. Mask wearing by 20    her family and others provided Kiki with a layer of 21    life-saving protection without isolation, allowing her to 22    live a fuller, happier life.   SB3340 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Medical device wearer" means any individual using 3protective medical equipment.4    "Operator" means any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, 5superintendent, agent, or occupant of a place of public 6accommodation or an employee of any such person or persons.7    "Place of public accommodation" includes, but is not 8limited to:9        (1) an inn, hotel, motel, or other place of lodging, 10    except for an establishment located within a building that 11    contains not more than 5 units for rent or hire and that is 12    actually occupied by the proprietor of such establishment 13    as the residence of such proprietor;14        (2) a restaurant, bar, or other establishment serving 15    food or drink;16        (3) a movie theater, theater, concert hall, stadium, 17    or other place of exhibition or entertainment;18        (4) an auditorium, convention center, lecture hall, or 19    other place of public gathering;20        (5) a bakery, grocery store, clothing store, hardware 21    store, shopping center, or other sales or rental 22    establishment;23        (6) a laundromat, drycleaner, bank, barber shop, 24    beauty shop, travel service, shoe repair service, funeral 25    parlor, gas station, office of an accountant or lawyer, 26    pharmacy, insurance office, professional office of a   SB3340 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1    health care provider, hospital, or other service 2    establishment;3        (7) public conveyances on air, water, or land;4        (8) a terminal, depot, or other station used for 5    specified public transportation;6        (9) a museum, library, gallery, or other place of 7    public display or collection;8        (10) a park, zoo, amusement park, or other place of 9    recreation;10        (11) a nonsectarian nursery, day care center, 11    elementary, secondary, undergraduate, or postgraduate 12    school, or other place of education;13        (12) a senior citizen center, homeless shelter, food 14    bank, nonsectarian adoption agency, or other social 15    service center establishment; and16        (13) a gymnasium, health spa, bowling alley, golf 17    course, or other place of exercise or recreation.18    "Protective medical equipment" means equipment worn to 19reduce or minimize exposure to health risks to oneself or 20others, which includes, but is not limited to:21        (1) face masks and respirators, with or without 22    particulate matter or vapor cartridges, including KN-95, 23    N-95, FFP-2, and FFP-3 quality protection;24        (2) elastomeric protection, such as, but not limited 25    to, P-100 protection;26        (3) powered air purifying respirators; and  SB3340 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1        (4) gloves, face shields, protective eyewear, clear 2    window masks, and small air purifiers worn on a lanyard.3    "Protective medical equipment" does not include ski masks 4and balaclavas.5    "Public official" means any officer or employee of the 6State or any agency, including State political subdivisions, 7municipal corporations, park districts, forest preserve 8districts, educational institutions, and schools.9    "Undue hardship" means an action that is prohibitively 10expensive or disruptive when considered in light of the 11following factors:12        (1) the nature and cost of ensuring the right to wear 13    protective medical equipment;14        (2) the overall financial resources of the facility or 15    facilities involved in ensuring the right to wear 16    protective medical equipment, the number of persons 17    employed at such facility, the effect on expenses and 18    resources, or the impact of ensuring the right to wear 19    protective medical equipment upon the operation of the 20    facility;21        (3) the overall financial resources of the operator, 22    the overall size of the business of the place of public 23    accommodation with respect to the number of its operators, 24    and the number, type, and location of the facilities of 25    the place of public accommodation; and 26        (4) the type of operation or operations of the place   SB3340 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1    of public accommodation, including the composition, 2    structure, and functions of its workforce and the 3    geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal 4    relationship of the facility or facilities to the place of 5    public accommodation. 6    Section 15. Right to wear protective medical equipment.7    (a) General right.8        (1) All individuals within this State have the right 9    to wear protective medical equipment in any place of 10    public accommodation where they have a lawful right to be 11    without obligation to disclose health status or any other 12    protected information.13        (2) No person, entity, or authority shall deny, 14    restrict, or infringe upon this right.15    (b) Nondiscrimination.16        (1) Operators and public officials shall not 17    discriminate against or penalize medical device wearers 18    for exercising their right to wear protective medical 19    equipment.20        (2) Discrimination under this Act includes, but is not 21    limited to:22            (A) denial of goods, services, facilities, 23        privileges, advantages, or accommodations;24            (B) eviction from premises;25            (C) any form of harassment to remove or refrain   SB3340 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1        from wearing such equipment for any amount of time;2            (D) actions taken by employers, including, but not 3        limited to:4                (i) creating a hostile work environment; and5                (ii) termination of employment; and6            (E) provision of unequal goods, services, 7        facilities, advantages, or accommodations. 8    Section 20. Protection against retaliation.9    (a) Operators and public officials shall not retaliate or 10take adverse action against a medical device wearer for 11exercising their right to wear protective medical equipment or 12for reporting violations of this Act.13    (b) Retaliation under this Act includes, but is not 14limited to:15        (1) intimidation or harassment;16        (2) denying future service;17        (3) reducing or changing pay or hours;18        (4) disciplining; and19        (5) reassignment to a less desirable position. 20    Section 25. Exceptions.21    (a) Security requirements. Protective medical equipment 22may be removed temporarily by the medical device wearer upon 23request by law enforcement in accordance with security 24regulations, procedures, or protocols under State and federal   SB3340 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1law, provided that reasonable accommodation is offered.2    (b) Operational safety. Specific types of protective 3medical equipment may be restricted if proven to interfere 4with the safe operation of machinery or hazardous 5environments, provided that reasonable accommodation or 6equivalent protection is offered to the individual.7    (c) Age and identity restricted products. Protective 8medical equipment shall be briefly removed by the medical 9device wearer upon request by an operator to verify 10identification to purchase any product for which verification 11of the identity or age of an individual is required by State or 12federal law, including, but not limited to:13        (1) alcohol;14        (2) tobacco products;15        (3) marijuana products;16        (4) prescriptions;17        (5) firearms and ammunition;18        (6) cleaning chemicals containing sodium hydroxide or 19    corrosive substances;20        (7) fertilizer; and21        (8) any additional products restricted by State or 22    federal law.23    (d) Financial institution customer identification. 24Protective medical equipment shall be briefly removed by the 25medical device wearer upon request by an operator of a bank, 26savings bank, credit union, or trust company, or any   SB3340 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1subsidiary or affiliate thereof, that is authorized to do 2business under the laws of this State or of the United States, 3to verify identification upon entering the premises of the 4bank, savings bank, credit union, or trust company, or a 5subsidiary or affiliate thereof.6    (e) Lodging customer identification. Protective medical 7equipment shall be briefly removed by the medical device 8wearer upon request by an operator of an inn, motel, or other 9place of lodging to verify identification upon check-in.10    (f) Reasonable confirmation of identity. For applicable 11situations under subsections (c), (d), and (e), a person 12wearing protective medical equipment may continue to do so if 13clear window masks or other forms of protective medical 14equipment allow an operator to reasonably confirm the 15individual's facial features without removal of the protective 16medical equipment.17        (1) Determination of whether identity can be 18    reasonably confirmed shall be at the discretion of the 19    operator, consistent with State and federal law.20        (2) If the operator cannot reasonably confirm the 21    individual's identity while the protective equipment 22    remains in place, the operator may request that the 23    individual briefly remove the equipment solely for the 24    purpose of visual identification.25        (3) An operator shall not be liable for refusing to 26    sell, provide, or deliver any product, service, guest   SB3340 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19556 BAB 33004 b1    accommodation, or room if:2            (A) verification of identity or age is required by 3        State or federal law; or4            (B) the operator, in good faith, determines that 5        identity cannot be reasonably confirmed while the 6        protective medical equipment remains in place, and the 7        individual refuses to comply with a reasonable request 8        to briefly remove protective medical equipment for 9        visual identification.10        (4) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require 11    an operator to complete a sale, furnish a service, or 12    provide access to guest accommodations to any individual 13    who declines to comply with such a reasonable request.14    (g) Undue hardship exemption. The operator of a place of 15public accommodation has the burden of proving undue hardship. 16The fact that an operator would allow similarly situated 17individuals to wear protective medical equipment creates a 18rebuttable presumption that the right to wear protective 19medical equipment does not impose an undue hardship on the 20operator. 21    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 22severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.